Maine, session 132, LD923.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §1912-C, sub-§5, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 549, §3, is
amended to read:
A. A college or university that:;
(1) Is located within 15 miles of an exit and has an enrollment of 300 or more
students attending classes on site; or
(2) Has an enrollment of 1,000 or more students attending classes on site;